Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1754.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 70 O.S. 2021, Section 1-116, as
amended by Section 1, Chapter 281, O.S.L. 2024 (70 O.S. Supp. 2024,
Section 1-116), is amended to read as follows:
Section 1-116. As used in this title:
1. "Teacher" means any person who is employed to serve as
district superintendent, principal, supervisor, counselor,
librarian, school nurse, athletic trainer, licensed physical
therapist, physical therapist assistant, occupational therapist,
occupational therapist assistant, or classroom teacher or in any
other instructional, supervisory or administrative capacity. The
person shall not be deemed qualified unless the person holds a valid
Req. No. 10400 Page 1

cert ificate issued by and in accordance with the rules of the State
Board of Education or the rules of the State Board of Career and
Technology Education, to perform the particular services for which
the person is employed;
2. "Superintendent" or "superintendent of schools" means the
executive officer of the board of education and the administrative
head of the school system of a district maintaining an accredited
school, provided the person holds an administrator's certificate
recognized by the State Board of Education;
3. "Principal" means any person other than a district
superintendent of schools having supervisory or administrative
authority over any school or school building having two or more
teachers. A teaching principal shall be a principal who devotes at
least one-half (1/2) the time school is in session to classroom
teaching. Teaching principals shall be required to hold
administrative certificates;
4. "Teachers" means, for purposes of complying with the State
Aid Law and other statutes, but not any other provision of law,
which apportion money on the basis of teaching units or the number
of teachers employed or qualified, all persons holding proper
certificates and connected in any capacity with the instruction of
pupils;


Req. No. 10400 Page 2

5. "Inductee" means any certified teacher who is employed in a
local school to serve as a classroom teacher under the guidance and
assistance of a mentor teacher or teachers;
6. "Student teacher" means any student who is enrolled in an
institution of higher learning approved by the State Board of
Education for teacher training and who is jointly assigned by the
institution of higher learning and a board of education of a school
district to perform practice teaching under the direction of a
regularly employed and certified teacher. A student teacher, while
serving an internship under the supervision of a certified teacher,
shall be accorded the same protection of the laws as that accorded
the certified teacher and shall be eligible to receive compensation
beginning on the first day of the internship for up to one full
school year; provided, however, that such compensation shall not be
considered compensation for purposes of teacher retirement or the
minimum salary schedule;
7. "School nurse" means a person employed full time by a board
of education who is a registered nurse licensed by the Oklahoma
State Board of Nurse Registration and Nursing Education and is
certified the same as a teacher by the State Board of Education.
Provided, that any person who is employed as a full-time school
nurse in any school district in Oklahoma who is not registered on
July 2, 1971, may continue to serve in the same capacity; however,
such person shall, under rules adopted by the State Board of
Req. No. 10400 Page 3

Educ ation, attend classes in nursing and prepare to become
registered. A school nurse employed by a board of education shall
be accorded the same protection of laws and all other benefits as a
certified teacher;
8. "Athletic trainer" means a person employed full time by a
board of education who is a Certified Athletic Trainer with current
certification from the Board of Certification of the National
Athletic Trainers' Association and is also currently licensed to
practice in the state in accordance with the State Board of Medical
Licensure and Supervision. An athletic trainer employed by a board
of education shall be accorded the same protection of laws and all
other benefits as a certified teacher; and
9. "Support employee" means an employee who provides those
services which are not performed by certified teachers, principals,
superintendents, or administrators and which are necessary for the
efficient and satisfactory functioning of a school district;
10. "Licensed physical therapist" means a person employed full
time by a board of education who is licensed as required in the
Physical Therapy Practice Act, a member of the American Physical
Therapy Association, and who regularly practices physical therapy.
A licensed physical therapist employed by a board of education shall
be accorded the same protection of laws and all other benefits as a
certified teacher;

Req. No. 10400 Page 4

11. "Physical therapist assistant" means a person employed full
time by a board of education who assists in the practice of physical
therapy subject to the direction and supervision of a licensed
physical therapist, who meets all the educational requirements, and
who is licensed pursuant to the provisions of the Physical Therapy
Practice Act, and who is a member of the American Physical Therapy
Association. A physical therapist assistant employed by a board of
education shall be accorded the same protection of laws and all
other benefits as a certified teacher;
12. "Occupational therapist" means a person employed full time
by a board of education who is licensed to practice occupational
therapy pursuant to the provisions of the Occupational Therapy
Practice Act and who is certified by the National Board for
Certification in Occupational Therapy. An occupational therapist
employed by a board of education shall be accorded the same
protection of laws and all other benefits as a certified teacher;
and
13. "Occupational therapist assistant" means a person employed
full time by a board of education who is licensed to provide
occupational therapy treatment under the general supervision of a
licensed occupational therapist pursuant to the provisions of the
Occupational Therapy Practice Act and who is certified by the
National Board for Certification in Occupational Therapy. An
occupational therapist assistant employed by a board of education
Req. No. 10400 Page 5

shal l be accorded the same protection of laws and all other benefits
as a certified teacher.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.

60-1-10400 AQH 12/16/24



















Req. No. 10400 Page 6